Utah statutes.
20A-11-1603.   Financial disclosure form -- Required when filing for candidacy -- Public availability.

(1)  Candidates seeking the following offices shall file a financial disclosure with the filing officer at the time of filing a declaration of candidacy:

(a)  state constitutional officer;

(b)  state legislator; or

(c)  State Board of Education member.

(2)  A filing officer may not accept a declaration of candidacy for an office listed in Subsection (1) unless the declaration of candidacy is accompanied by the financial disclosure required by this section.

(3)  The financial disclosure form shall contain the same requirements and shall be in the same format as the financial disclosure form described in Section 76-8-109.

(4)  The financial disclosure form shall:

(a)  be made available for public inspection at the filing officer's place of business;

(b)  if the filing officer is an individual other than the lieutenant governor, be provided to the lieutenant governor within five business days of the date of filing and be made publicly available at the Office of the Lieutenant Governor; and

(c)  be made publicly available on the Statewide Electronic Voter Information Website administered by the lieutenant governor.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

